Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.040

"Student residing in a nonhigh school district" defined.

The term "student residing in a nonhigh school district" and its equivalent as used in RCW 28A.545.030 through 28A.545.110 and 84.52.0531 shall mean any common school-age person with or without disabilities who resides within the boundaries of a nonhigh school district that does not conduct the particular kindergarten through grade twelve grade which the person has not yet successfully completed and is eligible to enroll in, not including students enrolled in an innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 through 28A.340.090.

[ 2010 c 99 s 7; 1995 c 77 s 25; 1990 c 33 s 489; 1981 c 264 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.44.160.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2010 c 99: See note following RCW 28A.340.080.

Severability—1981 c 264: See note following RCW 28A.545.030.